Massachusetts, session 194th, H1133.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 47PP the following section:-
Section 47QQ. Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth that provides coverage for prescription drugs
shall establish a separate out-of-pocket limit for prescription drugs, which shall include specialty
drugs. The out-of-pocket limit shall not exceed the dollar amount set as the minimum annual
deductible for a high deductible health plan under section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §223 (c)(2)(A)(i), for self-only and family coverage, respectively. For
the purposes of this section the term “out-of-pocket limit” shall include expenses that: (1) are a
cost-sharing expenditure under section 1302 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable
Care Act, 42 U.S.C. §18022 (c)(3); and (2) relate to prescription drug coverage.
of 3

SECTION 2. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 8QQ the following section:-
Section 8RR. Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual
or group hospital service plan which is delivered, issued, or renewed within the commonwealth
that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall establish a separate out-of-pocket limit for
prescription drugs, which shall include specialty drugs. The out out-of-pocket limit shall not
exceed the dollar amount set as the minimum annual deductible for a high deductible health plan
under section 223 of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §223 (c)(2)(A)(i), for
self-only and family coverage, respectively. For the purposes of this section the term “out-of-
pocket limit” shall include expenses that: (1) are a cost-sharing expenditure under section 1302
of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. §18022 (c)(3); and (2) relate
to prescription drug coverage.
SECTION 3. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4QQ the following section:-
Section 4RR. Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth that provides coverage for
prescription drugs shall establish a separate out-of-pocket limit for prescription drugs, which
shall include specialty drugs. The out-of-pocket limit shall not exceed the dollar amount set as
the minimum annual deductible for a high deductible health plan under section 223 of the federal
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §223 (c)(2)(A)(i), for self-only and family coverage,
respectively. For the purposes of this section the term “out-of-pocket limit” shall include
expenses that: (1) are a cost-sharing expenditure under section 1302 of the federal Patient
of 3

Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. §18022 (c)(3); and (2) relate to prescription drug
coverage.
SECTION 4. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 4GG the following section:-
Section 4HH. Any individual or group health maintenance organization that provides
coverage for prescription drugs shall establish a separate out-of-pocket limit for prescription
drugs, which shall include specialty drugs. The out-of-pocket limit shall not exceed the dollar
amount set as the minimum annual deductible for a high deductible health plan under section 223
of the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986, 26 U.S.C. §223 (c)(2)(A)(i), for self-only and
family coverage, respectively. For the purposes of this section the term “out-of-pocket limit”
shall include expenses that: (1) are a cost-sharing expenditure under section 1302 of the federal
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, 42 U.S.C. §18022 (c)(3); and (2) relate to
prescription drug coverage.
SECTION 5. This act shall apply to all policies, contracts and certificates of health
insurance subject to section 47QQ of chapter 175, section 8RR of chapter 176A, section 4RR of
chapter 176B and section 4HH of chapter 176G of the General Laws delivered, issued or
renewed on or after January 1, 2025.
of 3